Indiana, session 2026, HB1185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-32-8-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.12-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. Money in the fund may be spent in the
following ways:
(1) To increase district technical assistance in local conservation
efforts.
(2) To develop an environmental stewardship program to assist
land occupiers in complying with environmental regulations
voluntarily.
(3) To qualify for federal matching funds.
(4) To provide for the following cost sharing programs:
(A) A program to encourage land occupiers to implement
conservation practices to reduce nutrient, pesticide, and
sediment runoff.
(B) Programs that encourage land occupiers to implement
nutrient management programs by sharing the cost of any of
the following:
HB 1185—LS 6810/DI 148


(i) Fencing for intensive grazing systems.
(ii) Purchasing nutrient management equipment.
(iii) Voluntary environmental audits.
(iv) Other similar expenditures related to nutrient
management.
(5) To provide matching grants to districts for the following:
(A) Professional watershed coordinators to facilitate and
administer local watershed protection projects.
(B) District managers to administer district conservation
policies and programs.
(6) To increase state technical and capacity building assistance to
districts and local conservation efforts by providing for the
following:
(A) Capacity building specialists to train district personnel in
grant writing, grant administration, and leadership
development.
(B) Conservation education specialists to help implement
district conservation education efforts.
(C) Urban storm water specialists to provide technical
assistance to developers to contain soil erosion on construction
sites.
(7) To make distributions as provided under section 8 of this
chapter.
(8) Implementation of geographic information systems (GIS) or
similar technology.
(9) To provide for the management of invasive plant species.
(10) To provide funding for:
(A) the installation and maintenance of mesonet sites under
IC 15-11-4-3; and
(B) data modeling gathered from mesonet sites in
collaboration with state and federal agencies and the state
climate office hosted by Purdue University that provides
beneficial information and modeling for agricultural
purposes, including agriculture decision making tools.
SECTION 2. IC 15-11-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.95-2016,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The division shall do the following:
(1) Provide administrative and staff support for the soil
conservation board.
(2) Administer all programs relating to land and soil conservation
in Indiana.
(3) Manage Indiana's watersheds.
HB 1185—LS 6810/DI 148


(4) Administer the clean water Indiana program.
(5) Perform other functions assigned by the secretary or the
director.
(6) Work in collaboration with state and federal agencies and
research institutions in the installation and maintenance of
mesonet sites.
(b) The duties of the division do not include administering the Lake
Michigan Coastal program. The Lake Michigan Coastal program shall
administer the state's compliance with and provide assistance under the
federal Coastal Zone Management Act (16 U.S.C. 1451 et seq.).
SECTION 3. IC 15-11-9-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2009,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The director shall may perform
the following duties:
(1) Work with each county to develop an annual a regional
strategic assessment of Indiana agricultural industries agriculture
and establish targeted priorities for industry expansion. each
region.
(2) Develop recommendations for legislative and administrative
programs that will enhance economic market development in the
targeted agricultural industries. for farmers, producers, and
agricultural businesses.
(3) Establish cooperative industry research and development
initiatives that lead to new agricultural industry opportunities in
Indiana.
(4) Serve as a resource for industry in the planning, promotion,
and development of value added agricultural products and
agricultural industry opportunities in Indiana, including product
feasibility, market feasibility, economic feasibility, product
development, product testing, and test marketing.
(5) Serve as a resource for industry and the state in attracting
value added developing agricultural industry to Indiana. markets
for Indiana agriculture.
(6) Develop private sector research funding and technology
transfer programs commensurate with the state's targeted
agricultural industry economic market development objectives.
(7) Provide a forum for continuing dialogue among industry,
government, and researchers in addressing the needs and
opportunities for expanding the value added agricultural industry.
markets.
(8) Make grants from the fund to farmers, producers,
agricultural businesses, associations, or organizations to
HB 1185—LS 6810/DI 148


support the purposes of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 15-11-9-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.2-2008, SECTION
2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The value added research agricultural market
development fund is established to provide money for:
(1) the center for value added research; agricultural market
development; and
(2) the director to carry out the duties specified under IC 15-11-6
and this chapter.
(b) The director shall administer the fund.
(c) The fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated by the general assembly; and
(2) donations, grants, and money received from any other
source.
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
SECTION 5. IC 26-3-7-6.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.114-2025,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.3. (a) The grain buyers and warehouse licensing
agency license fee fund is established to provide funds for the
administration of this chapter and IC 26-3-7.5. The fund shall be
administered by the agency. The fund consists of:
(1) the moisture testing device inspection fees collected under
IC 26-3-7.5-6;
(2) the licensing fees collected under section 4.4 of this chapter;
(3) the fines collected under this chapter;
(4) gifts and bequests; and
(5) appropriations made by the general assembly.
(b) Expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from money in
the fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that accrues
from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(d) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not revert
to the state general fund.
(e) With the approval of the budget agency, the money in the
fund allocated under this section may be used to augment and
supplement the funds appropriated for the implementation of this
HB 1185—LS 6810/DI 148


chapter.
HB 1185—LS 6810/DI 148


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Agriculture and Rural
Development, to which was referred House Bill 1185, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1185 as introduced.)
AYLESWORTH
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0
HB 1185—LS 6810/DI 148